Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Department of Health
§ 9-2-127.
Community health centers and rural health clinics; process for grants facilitating capital construction, start up costs and equipment costs; account established; grant criteria.

There is created a process for grants facilitating capital construction and for start up costs and equipment costs of community health centers and rural health clinics. The process shall be administered by the Wyoming department of health, which shall award grants in accordance with this section and consistent with the requirements imposed for the receipt of any federal grants when applicable.

The primary care support account is created. The account shall consist of those funds appropriated to the account by the legislature and all monies received from federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and donations to the account. The account is specifically empowered to accept grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and donations. Funds in the account are continuously appropriated to the department for the purpose of providing grants under subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

The department shall establish by rule and regulation an application procedure and calendar for grants awarded under this section and adopt other rules as necessary to implement this section.

Any grants provided by the department under this section that are funded in whole or in part with state funds shall be subject to the following:

Before submission to the department, and following public notice and a hearing, the application shall be approved by the board of county commissioners for the county in which the community health center or rural health clinic is located or proposed to be located;

Grants may be made to community health centers and rural health clinics for one-time startup costs of a new center or clinic, for existing centers or clinics to expand the population served or initiate new services for existing or new centers or clinics to facilitate compliance with quality criteria. The grants shall be used for capital expenses, start up costs and equipment costs only and shall not be used for ongoing operating expenses;

Grants to any one (1) center or clinic shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) of state funds;

Grant applications shall include evidence of a commitment of local matching funds of at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the state funds grant amount in cash, in kind or both;

Centers or clinics awarded a grant shall provide services to the public regardless of the ability to pay; and

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 54, § 2.

Grants shall be awarded only if the applicant can demonstrate an operating plan that integrates health care services within the entire service community to promote accessibility and quality of care. The plan shall provide for integration enhancement through the use of the Medicare and Medicaid electronic health records program, the small rural hospital improvement program and other similar programs.

A grant recipient under this section shall agree to provide health care services in an underserved community of the state, from among a list of communities developed by the department, for a period of at least three (3) years under the agreement. The recipient shall accept as its first priority and treat without reservation patients qualified under the Medical Assistance and Services Act, Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act and the child health insurance program who seek medical care which the health care provider is qualified to provide.

The department of health, office of rural health care, shall:

Conduct outreach and education among persons, entities and groups interested in forming a community health center or rural health clinic and submitting a new access point grant application to the United States department of health and human services, health resources and services administration;

Collect and maintain appropriate data regarding the primary care support program’s effect on improvements in community and rural health.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 54, § 2.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 135, § 1; 2017 ch. 177, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2021 ch. 54, §§ 1, 2, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2017 amendment

, in (g) substituted “June 30, 2021” for “June 30, 2017,” which extends the sunset repeal date.

Laws 2017, ch. 213, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2017.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 54, § 1, in (a), added "for" preceding "start up," and equipment costs" following " costs" and ", which shall award grants in accordance with this section and consistent with the requirements imposed for the receipt of any federal grants when applicable" at the end; substituted "this section" for "subsection (d)" in (c); substituted "Any grants provided by the department under this section that are funded in whole or in part with state funds shall be" for "The department shall provide grants," in (d); in the last sentence of (d)(ii), substituted "expenses," for "and" and "costs and equipment costs" for "expenses"; and added "and" at the end of (d)(v).

Laws 2021, ch. 54, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 54, § 2, repealed (d)(vi), which read, "Grant applicants shall provide proof of designation as a rural health clinic or federally qualified community health center; and"; and repealed (g), which read, "This section is repealed effective April 1, 2021."

Laws 2021, ch. 54, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2011, ch. 135, § 2, provides: “(a) There is appropriated one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) from the general fund to the primary care support account. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of grants to community health centers and rural health clinics pursuant to W.S.

9-2-127

. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. Any unexpended monies in the account shall not revert but shall remain in the account to be expended for the purposes specified in this act.

“(b) There is appropriated one hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000.00)from the general fund to the department of health. This appropriationshall be for the period beginning with the effective date of thisact and ending June 30, 2012. This appropriation shall only be expendedfor the purpose of administering the program created pursuant to W.S.

9-2-127

. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriationshall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and anyunexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shallrevert as provided by law on June 30, 2012.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 135, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 9-2-128.
Health care innovation; studies; account.

The department is authorized to carry out innovative studies relating to the following:

Reduction of costs associated with long-term care, chronic disease or other health care services to the state of Wyoming;

Allowing individuals in need of long-term care to remain in their homes and communities;

Developing necessary long-term care or other health care services in Wyoming;

Use of broadband internet to access health care services.

There is created the health care innovation account. Funds in the account may include any applicable federal funds and shall be used to carry out innovative studies under this section, subject to legislative appropriation.

Not later than September 30 of each year, the department shall provide a report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the joint appropriations committee relating to funding and studies carried out under this section.

The department may enter into agreements to carry out this section. Except as otherwise provided in this section, agreements under this section shall be exempt from the procurement requirements set forth in W.S.

9-2-3204

and other state laws and rules governing the procurement of services by a state agency. The department shall obtain approval of all agreements from the attorney general.

A person undertaking an innovative study under this section shall make available to the department all documents relating to the study for review upon request. Documents under this section containing any personally identifiable information or any trade secret shall not be subject to the Wyoming Public Records Act.

The department may adopt rules to implement this section, including specifying a method of application for funding and standards for program operation.

As used in this section:

“Innovative study” means a randomized, controlled trial, pilot project, model or analysis conducted under scientific conditions for:

Assessing a new approach to the provision of long-term care, care of chronic diseases, early detection or other health care services which have no substantially comparable, widely available analogue in Wyoming;

Testing of noninvasive diagnostic equipment. As used in this paragraph, “noninvasive” means equipment that does not cause mental or physical effects on the human body.

“Innovative study” shall not include the testing of pharmaceuticals, medical procedures or medical devices other than noninvasive diagnostic equipment.

History.

2019 ch. 175, § 1, effective March 8, 2019; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3204" for "9-2-1016" in the second sentence of (d).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 175 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

§ 9-2-129.
Waiver of rules.

The department may waive existing rules as necessary to carry out an innovative study under W.S.

9-2-128

.

The department shall adopt rules specifying standards for a waiver under this section.

History.

2019 ch. 175, § 1, effective March 8, 2019.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 175 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

§ 9-2-130.
Mental health and substance use disorder programming; department of corrections; criminal justice populations.

Pursuant to this section and W.S. 25-1-105(f) and (g), the department of health shall collaborate with the department of corrections to reduce recidivism rates for persons with behavioral health needs and substance use disorders who are involved in the criminal justice system and improve mental health and substance use disorder programming by:

Creating a behavioral health services enhancement program for community providers to improve outcomes for persons involved in the criminal justice system through a separate contract, or in a separate provision in an existing contract, administered by the department of health;

Adopting standardized, evidence based treatment practices and guidelines for treating and providing programming to persons involved in the criminal justice system with behavioral health and substance use needs;

Increasing communication between the department of health, the department of corrections and contracted behavioral health providers working with persons involved in the criminal justice system;

Promoting and requiring to the maximum extent practical and permissible under applicable laws and regulations the portability and universal recognition of mental health and substance use disorder assessment tools and other assessment tools that may be applicable to mental health and substance use disorder treatment; and

Creating a competitive and outcomes based funding stream for behavioral health providers to:

Expand existing services for criminal justice involved populations;

Improve the quality and availability of services and programs;

Train and develop the skills of providers and stakeholders working with persons who have behavior health needs and substance use disorders and who are involved in the criminal justice system.

This section shall not be interpreted to require the creation or maintenance of any duplicate functions, services or programs in the department of health and the department of corrections, but shall be interpreted with W.S. 25-1-105(f) and (g) to require coordination and collaboration between the agencies to assure the creation and maintenance of independent or coordinated functions, services and programs to meet the goals of this section and W.S. 25-1-105(f) and (g).

History.

2020 ch. 152, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 152, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 9-2-131.
Wyoming health information exchange.

This section codifies the statewide health information exchange authorized by 2016 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 31, Section 048, except that the term “multi-payer” in that section shall not be codified or impose any requirements on the operation of the information exchange as provided for under this section. The department of health is authorized to administer and maintain the exchange to facilitate the secure and voluntary sharing of electronic health information between health care providers for the benefit of Wyoming residents.

The department may charge reasonable participation fees to participating entities, which shall not include individual patients, subject to the following:

Fees shall be established by rule promulgated in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Fees shall be established in an amount sufficient to recoup the department’s costs for administering and maintaining the exchange in accordance with this section; and

Fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be credited to a special revenue account, which shall be expended only for administration and maintenance costs associated with operating the statewide health information exchange.

History.

2021 ch. 29, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 29, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.